Louisiana, session 2026, HB706.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:4.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4.4. Class II disposal wells; maximum authorized surface injection pressure
A. The purpose of this Section is to establish the following for commercial
Class II disposal wells:
(1) A default maximum authorized surface injection pressure.
(2) A process for operators to apply to the department for an increased
maximum authorized surface injection pressure.
(3) A timeline in which the department shall approve or disapprove of
applications for an increased maximum authorized surface injection pressure.
B. Definitions. The terms in this Subsection shall have the following
meaning for the purposes of this Section:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-974 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 706
(1) "Confining zone" means a geological formation, group of formations, or
part of a formation stratigraphically overlying the injection zone that acts as a barrier
to fluid movement above an injection zone.
(2) "Disposal well" means a commercial Class II injection well that is used
to inject into the subsurface exploration and production wastes as defined in LAC
43:XIX.501.
(3) "Fracture gradient" means the pressure gradient, expressed in pounds per
square inch per foot, at which hydraulic fractures initiate in a formation.
(4) "Injection interval" or "injection point" means the portion of the injection
zone where the perforations of the injection well are located and where injection into
the formation occurs, measured from the top-most perforation to the bottom-most
perforation.
(5) "Injection zone" means a geological formation, group of formations, or
part of a formation permitted to receive fluids through a well.
(6) "MASIP" means the maximum authorized surface injection pressure.
(7) "Verified field data" means data obtained from step-rate tests,
instantaneous shut-in pressure (ISIP) measurements, fracture-closure pressure
determinations, fall-off analyses, or other tests performed in accordance with
American Petroleum Institute Recommended Practice (API RP) 100-1 or its
successor.
C. Baseline standard. Injection pressure at the wellhead shall not exceed a
maximum which shall be calculated so as to assure that the pressure during injection
does not initiate new fractures or propagate existing fractures through the confining
zone.
D. Default MASIP. If no application for an increased MASIP is made
pursuant to Subsection E of this Section or if an applicant fails to meet the
requirements of Subsection E of this Section, the department may calculate the
MASIP at ninety percent of the fracture gradient for the injection interval, using the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-974 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 706
fracture gradient of the injection interval established in Eaton's fracture gradient
chart or with other verified field data.
E. Increases to the default MASIP.
(1) Any operator either seeking a commercial Class II disposal well permit
or with an existing commercial Class II disposal well permit may apply for an
increased MASIP by demonstrating the following to the department:
(a) Based on verified field data from the subject well or an offset well with
similar geology which is anchored to or with a calibrated fracture model or
supporting data set, an increased MASIP will not cause fractures to be initiated or
propagated through the confining zone. Fractures in or above the injection interval
and in the injection zone, as shown by the verified field data and the fracture model
or supporting data set, are permitted if the fractures do not extend through the
confining zone.
(b) A Louisiana-licensed professional engineer or geoscientist has attested
in an affidavit as to the validity of the data and model submitted.
(c) There is sufficient confining shale or qualifying confining formations
between the proposed injection interval and any intervals that are productive of oil
or gas within a one mile radius of the disposal well.
(d) The casing requirements provided in LAC 43:XIX.415 have been met.
(e) There are no artificial penetrations within the area of review or any such
penetrations have been properly sealed, completed, or plugged and abandoned.
(f) A monitoring well or wells monitor the base of the underground source
of drinking water.
(g) Historical seismic data for the area of interest does not show increased
seismicity or, if it does, the operator has submitted seismic monitoring and response
plans approved by the department. The area of interest for this demonstration shall
be a five mile radius from the well.
(2) If the demonstration submitted for a disposal well meets the requirements
of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the MASIP for the disposal well may be
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-974 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 706
permitted at up to one half pound per square inch per vertical foot, based on the
depth to the top-most perforation, but at a minimum shall be permitted at four-tenths
of a pound per square inch per vertical foot, based on the depth to the top-most
perforation.
(3) The department shall approve an increased MASIP that conforms with
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection or a written denial for failure to meet the required
demonstration within sixty days of receipt of an application submitted pursuant to
this Section.
G. Enforcement. Exceeding a permitted MASIP or violating a condition
imposed pursuant to this Section shall constitute a violation of this Section subject
to penalties provided in R.S. 30:18.